Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1820.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding sections to read:§ 9511.14. Transfers.Notwithstanding section 1703-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, to the contrary, the following amounts shall be transferred from the Budget Stabilization Reserve Fund to the Supplemental Roads and Bridges Account established under section 9511.15(a) (relating to Supplemental Roads and Bridges Account):(1) The sum of $500,000,000 shall be transferred not later than 30 days after the effective date of this section.(2) The sum of $500,000,000 shall be transferred on July 123456789101112131415161718 1, 2026.(3) The sum of $500,000,000 shall be transferred on July 1, 2027.(4) The sum of $500,000,000 shall be transferred on July 1, 2028.(5) The sum of $500,000,000 shall be transferred on July 1, 2029.§ 9511.15. Supplemental Roads and Bridges Account.(a) Account established.--The Supplemental Roads and Bridges Account is established as a restricted account in the Motor License Fund.(b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the account:(1) Amounts transferred to the account under section 9511.14 (relating to transfers).(2) Interest earned on money in the account.(3) Any other amounts appropriated or transferred to the account.(c) Appropriation.--Money in the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the purpose of funding projects related to the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance and repair of roads and bridges in this Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1820PN2240 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324